District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.23

Municipal planning.

(a)

The Mayor shall be the central planning agency for the District. He shall be responsible for the coordination of planning activities of the municipal government and the preparation and implementation of the District’s elements of the comprehensive plan for the National Capital which may include land use elements, urban renewal and redevelopment elements, a multi-year program of municipal public works for the District, and physical, social, economic, transportation, and population elements. The Mayor’s planning responsibility shall not extend to federal and international projects and developments in the District, as determined by the National Capital Planning Commission, or to the United States Capitol buildings and grounds as defined in §§ 10-503.11 and 10-503.26, or to any extension thereof or addition thereto, or to buildings and grounds under the care of the Architect of the Capitol. In carrying out his responsibilities under this section, the Mayor shall establish procedures for citizen involvement in the planning process and for appropriate meaningful consultation with any state or local government or planning agency in the National Capital region affected by any aspect of a proposed District element of the comprehensive plan (including amendments thereto) affecting or relating to the District.

(b)

The Mayor shall submit the District’s elements and amendments thereto to the Council for revision or modification, and adoption by act, following public hearings. Following adoption and prior to implementation, the Council shall submit such elements and amendments thereto to the National Capital Planning Commission for review and comment with regard to the impact of such elements or amendments on the interests and functions of the federal establishment, as determined by the Commission.

(c)

Such elements and amendments thereto shall be subject to and limited by determinations with respect to the interests and functions of the federal establishment as determined in the manner provided by act of Congress.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 792, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 423
Budget and financial management, multiyear capital improvements plan, see § 1-204.44.
National capital revitalization corporation, revitalization plan, see § 2-1219.12.
This section is referenced in § 1-204.44, § 1-306.01, and § 1-328.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-244.
1973 Ed., § 1-163.
Establishment of District of Columbia Advisory Council on Memorials: See Mayor’s Order 89-201, September 8, 1989.

Comprehensive plan goals and policies: Act of March 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-134, established the goals and policies of the District of Columbia as the first District element of the comprehensive plan for the National Capital.

Section 4 of the District of Columbia Comprehensive Plan Act of 1984 (D.C. Law 5-76) repealed the District of Columbia Comprehensive Plan Goals and Policies Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-134).

District of Columbia Comprehensive Plan of 1984: Section 2 of D.C. Law 8-129, as amended by § 201 of D.C. Law 8-132, amended Titles I through VIII, X and XI, and added Title XII to the District of Columbia Comprehensive Plan of 1984, adopted by D.C. Law 5-76. D.C. Law 8-129 was reprinted in its entirety in 37 DCR 55. Amended Titles I through VII, X, XI, and new Title XII will be codified at Title 10 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations. D.C. Law 8-132 is found at 37 DCR 2213.

Review of District elements by National Capital Planning Commission: Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 5-187, and § 4(b) of D.C. Law 8-129, provided that no District element of the Comprehensive Plan for the National Capital shall take effect until it has been reviewed by the National Capital Planning Commission as provided in subsection (a) of § 2-1002 and this section.